Tennessee, session 114, HB0100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-36-110(f), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting the following:
(1) The board shall hold regular monthly meetings and special meetings as may
be necessary for the transaction of the business of the authority. Special meetings of
the board may be called by the chair or, in the absence or disability of the chair, by any
board member. A meeting of the board must not be held unless a majority of the
directors are present. All acts of the board must be by a vote of at least a majority of the
directors eligible to vote on a matter. Resolutions of the board are effective upon
adoption after one (1) reading and may be adopted at the same meeting at which the
resolutions are introduced. The time and place of all meetings must be set by the board.
(2) The board members are allowed necessary traveling and other expenses
while engaged in the business of the board, plus an allowance for attendance at
meetings in the same manner and to the same extent as is provided for directors of
municipal electric systems under § 7-52-110. Such expenses constitute a cost of
operation and maintenance of the authority.
(3) The authorization set forth in subdivision (f)(2) supplements authorization
provided to the board of directors or other supervisory board of an energy authority or
HB0100
001043
- 1 -

utility authority created by a private act of the general assembly and is applicable to the
extent provided by such board.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001043